Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB275.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Affordable Homeownership Subsidy Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affordable unit." A housing unit for which the monthly mortgage payment does not exceed 28% of the gross monthly income of an eligible household."County applicant." A nonprofit entity, government entity or for-profit property developer that serves one or more counties.123456789101112131415161718 "Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth."Eligible household." An individual or family that earns between 60% and 120% of the area median income as determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development, adjusted for family size."Grant." A grant awarded under section 3(c)."Program." The Pennsylvania Affordable Homeownership Subsidy Program established under section 3(a).Section 3. Pennsylvania Affordable Homeownership Subsidy Program.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Affordable Homeownership Subsidy Program is established within the department for the purpose of subsidizing affordable homeownership for households with annual household incomes between 60% and 120% of the area median income in accordance with this section.(b) Application process.--The department shall establish an application process for the distribution of grants to be awarded under subsection (c) no later than 90 days after the effective date of this section.(c) Grants.--(1) The department shall award grants to no more than one county applicant for project types under subsection (d).(2) A grant awarded under paragraph (1) shall be no more than $125,000.(3) This subsection shall not be construed to:(i) prohibit the department from awarding more than one grant to a county applicant to serve multiple counties; or20250HB0275PN0219 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) limit how much funding an applicant may receive.(d) Homeownership affordability project types.--The program shall provide grants for the following project types:(1) Acquisition of properties suitable to serve as affordable units.(2) Design, architecture and engineering services necessary for the development of affordable units.(3) Homebuyer assistance programs to aid individuals and families in purchasing affordable units.(4) Asset management and mapping to ensure efficient utilization of resources and effective oversight of subsidized properties.(5) Social and environmental impact studies to assess the broader implications of affordable housing initiatives.(6) Homeownership education programs to provide prospective homeowners with necessary knowledge and skills for successful homeownership.(7) Home repair programs to address maintenance and repair needs of affordable housing units.(8) Workforce housing programs to address the housing needs of individuals and families within defined income specifications.(9) Acquisition of property by a land trust, provided that a homeowner maintains at least 40% of the equity on the property.Section 4. Administration by department.(a) Administration and oversight.--(1) The department shall be responsible for the administration and oversight of the program.20250HB0275PN0219 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Of the money appropriated for the program, the department may take an administrative fee of no more than 10% for direct costs associated with the administration of the program.(b) Guidelines.--The department shall establish guidelines, procedures and criteria for the implementation and administration of the program, which the department shall publish on its publicly accessible Internet website.(c) Collaboration.--The department may collaborate with other State agencies, local government entities, for-profit developers and nonprofit organizations to effectively implement the program.Section 5. Reports.(a) Department reporting.--No later than September 1 following the first fiscal year or any portion of the first fiscal year in which the program is in effect and no later than September 1 for all succeeding fiscal years in which the program is in effect, the department shall prepare a report on program outcomes and submit the report to the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Urban Affairs and Housing Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Housing and Community Development Committee of the House of Representatives.(b) Publishing of report.--The department shall publish the report submitted under subsection (a) on the department's 20250HB0275PN0219 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website.(c) County reporting.--The department may require county applicants awarded grants under the program to submit reports, on a form and in a manner prescribed by the department, containing information necessary for the department to comply with the reporting requirements under subsection (a).Section 6. Funding.The department's implementation of the program shall be contingent upon sufficient funding being appropriated or provided for the purpose of administering the program. In a year in which there is insufficient funding appropriated or provided for the administration of the program, the program shall be suspended until sufficient Federal or State money is appropriated by the General Assembly or other money is provided to the department for the program.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0275PN0219 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617